District of Columbia statutes.
47-351.14

Check cashing; identification.

(a)

An eligible financial institution shall cash checks issued by the District government without charge for both account and non-account holders.

(b)

An insured institution may require a holder of a check meeting the requirements of subsection (a) of this section to show proper identification. Proper identification is any form of identification as required by the bank in accordance with its rules and regulations.

Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(c), 44 DCR 6933
1981 Ed., § 47-351.14.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-351.01.